Utah statutes.
23-19-5.   Fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining a license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration.

(1)  It is unlawful for:

(a)  any person to obtain or attempt to obtain a license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation;

(b)  a nonresident to purchase a resident license; and

(c)  a resident to purchase a nonresident license.

(2)  Any license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration obtained in violation of Subsection (1) is invalid.

(3)  Any person violating Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(4)  A fraudulent claim of residency in another state or country does not exempt a person from the definition of resident in Section 23-13-2.

